Illinois, session 104th, SB791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Vocational Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 435/1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 694)7    Sec. 1. That That all of the provisions and benefits of an 8act of Congress entitled, "An Act to provide for the promotion 9of vocational education; to provide for cooperation with the 10states in the promotion of such education in agriculture and 11the trades and industries; to provide for cooperation with the 12states in the preparation of teachers of vocational subjects; 13and to appropriate money and regulate its expenditures," 14approved February 23, 1917, as amended, hereinafter referred 15to as the Federal Vocational Education Law, are hereby 16accepted by the State of Illinois.17(Source: Laws 1919, p. 928.)